Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 2 Legislative Proceedings
10-2-213, 10-2-214. [Repealed.]

(1)The chair of each of the standing, select, and joint committees of either house of the General Assembly, the cochairs of the Legislative Council and the chairs of each subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the chairs of each subcommittee of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, the Speaker Designate of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore Designate of the Senate, the House and Senate chairs of the Review/PEER Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee, the Personnel Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee, the Claims Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee, and the Special Language Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee, and the cochair of any committee of the General Assembly which does not function during the legislative session shall be eligible to receive an additional three thousand six hundred dollars ($3,600) per year for reimbursement of legislative expenses incurred.

(A)The vice chair of each of the standing, select, and joint committees of either house of the General Assembly and the vice chairs of the Legislative Council shall be eligible to receive two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400) per year for reimbursement of legislative expenses incurred.

If a member of the General Assembly is eligible to receive payment under this subdivision (a)(2) due to service in more than one (1) covered position, the member shall be eligible to receive three thousand six hundred dollars ($3,600) per year for reimbursement of legislative expenses incurred.

(A)The chair of each subcommittee of each standing committee of either house shall be eligible to receive an additional one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) per year for reimbursement of legislative expenses incurred.

If a member of the General Assembly is eligible to receive payment under this subdivision (a)(3) due to service in more than one (1) covered position, the member shall be eligible to receive three thousand six hundred dollars ($3,600) per year for reimbursement of legislative expenses incurred.

A member of the General Assembly shall not receive more than three thousand six hundred dollars ($3,600) per year under this section for reimbursement of legislative expenses incurred.

The chair of a committee established by rule of the House of Representatives or the Senate also may receive reimbursement of legislative expenses incurred under subsection (a) of this section if authorized by rule of the House of Representatives or the Senate.

(1)(A)A member of the Senate may seek reimbursement for expenses under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section by filing a signed statement of legislative expenses incurred during each calendar month with the Secretary of the Senate.

Expenses shall be paid from funds appropriated for such purposes for the use of the Senate.

(A)A member of the House of Representatives may seek reimbursement for expenses under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section by filing a signed statement of legislative expenses incurred during each calendar month with the Coordinator of House Legislative Services.

Expenses shall be paid from funds appropriated for such purposes for the use of the House of Representatives.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 935, § 13; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 12; 1991, No. 7, § 12; 1991, No. 969, § 3; 1991, No. 1240, § 3; 1995, No. 1312, § 15; 1997, No. 1285, § 16; 2005, No. 2100, § 14; 2007, No. 288, § 3; 2009, No. 2, § 5; 2009, No. 84, § 1; 2009, No. 248, § 1; 2011, No. 1, § 3; 2015, No. 555, § 3; 2015, No. 556, § 3.

10-2-216. [Repealed.]

(1)Members or alternate members serving as members of the interim committees of the General Assembly as defined in subsection (b) of this section and members of the General Assembly who shall perform “other interim legislative duties as authorized by law” as defined in subsection (b) of this section shall be entitled to receive per diem and mileage reimbursement in the amount prescribed by the Legislative Council not to exceed the amount as prescribed by regulations of the Internal Revenue Service.

However, members of the General Assembly shall not be entitled to per diem for attendance at regional or national meetings and seminars held outside the State of Arkansas, but in lieu thereof they shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual, reasonable, and necessary expenses for meals, lodging, transportation, and mileage, as authorized by law.

As used in this section:

History.

Acts 1985, No. 187, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-1007.1, 4-1007.2, 4-1007.2n; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 116, § 11; 1991, No. 969, § 4; 1991, No. 1240, § 4.

10-2-218. [Repealed.]

10-2-221. Contingent expenses.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 90, §§ 13-15; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4959 - 4961; Pope's Dig., §§ 6189 - 6191; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-506 — 4-508.

10-2-222. Printing, stationery, and supplies.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 115, §§ 1-3; Pope's Dig., §§ 6182 - 6184; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-503 — 4-505.

10-2-223. Authorization to meet during legislative recess — Compensation.

The various committees of the General Assembly that are authorized to meet during the interim between legislative sessions are hereby authorized to meet during a recess of the General Assembly of two (2) weeks or more in duration.

A member of the General Assembly attending meetings of his or her assigned committees or meetings of committees to which he or she is invited by the chair or chairs during the recess shall be entitled to mileage and per diem at the same rate and from the same sources as for attending committee meetings held after sine die adjournment of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 744, § 1.

10-2-224. Compensation for attendance at national or regional conferences.

When the General Assembly is in recess for a period of two (2) weeks or more, a member of the General Assembly is:

(A)Reimbursement for out-of-state travel is the lesser rate of reasonable airfare or the established rate of private car mileage based on map mileage when driven.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 744, § 2; 2011, No. 48, § 1; 2011, No. 71, § 1.

10-2-225. Funds.

Funds appropriated to the Bureau of Legislative Research for interim committee study expenses shall be available for use by interim committees meeting during an extended recess of the General Assembly as authorized in §10-2-223.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 744, § 3.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 2003, No. 744 became law without the Governor's signature.

Subchapter 3

— Witnesses

Cross References. Powers of each house, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 12.

Effective Dates. Acts 1875, No. 37, § 5: effective on passage.

10-2-301. Compelling attendance — Orders — Sentences.

The Senate and the House of Representatives meeting separately or in joint meeting may:

Issue the necessary subpoenas and process to summon and compel a person to appear before them or a committee thereof;

Carry into execution their orders and sentences; and

Summon and compel the attendance of witnesses in as full a manner as a court of law and with like effect.

A subpoena for a witness shall be issued at the request of:

A member of the Senate or a member of the House with the majority support of the member's respective house;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate on behalf of the majority of the members of the Senate;

The Speaker of the House of Representatives on behalf of the majority of the members of the House; and

The party accused.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning requests for subpoenas, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 1465, § 3. This section was derived from Rev. Stat., ch. 90, § 9; C. & M. Dig., § 4930; Pope's Dig., § 6152; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-202.

All process issued for a joint meeting of the Senate and the House shall be under the hand of the:

Speaker of the House of Representatives and attested by the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives if the process was requested by a member of the House or the Speaker of the House of Representatives; or

President Pro Tempore of the Senate and attested by the Secretary of the Senate if the process was requested by:

A member of the Senate;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate; or

The party accused if the party accused is not a member of the House, a member of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote (a) and (b); and added (c).

Every witness attending either house or a committee thereof or a joint meeting of both houses, being summoned, shall be allowed the same fees as allowed by law to witnesses for their attendance in any court, to be paid as other costs.

The fees of all officers and witnesses before either house, or a joint meeting, and all other costs and expenses arising therein, shall be paid out of the contingent fund of the house in which the proceedings may be had or if had in a joint meeting of both houses, then out of the contingent fund of the General Assembly unless the party charged be adjudged to pay the costs and expenses, in which case he or she shall pay them, and payment may be enforced by attachment.

In cases not otherwise provided for by law, depositions may be taken and read in either house or before a committee thereof, or before both houses in joint meeting, in all cases in which the taking and reading of depositions would be allowed in any cause pending before a court of law.

When necessary, the presiding officer of the house in which they may be required or of a joint meeting may issue commissions to take such depositions.

The proceedings in taking and returning depositions shall be the same as may be prescribed by law for taking depositions to be read in a court of law.

The chair or a member at any time acting as chair of a committee of either house of the General Assembly or joint committee of the two (2) houses of the General Assembly, or his or her designee, when the committee is empowered to issue subpoenas for persons, papers, or records, shall be fully empowered to administer oaths and to take depositions for the purpose for which the committee or joint committee is empowered to issue subpoenas for persons, papers, or records.

(1)If a person subpoenaed to appear before the Senate, the House of Representatives, or a Senate or House committee or joint interim committee fails to appear or produce subpoenaed material, the fact of the refusal to appear or produce subpoenaed material shall be certified to the circuit court of the county in which the hearing is held.

A person who is administered the oath and who provides false testimony while under oath is guilty of perjury and subject to the penalties prescribed by law.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

Cross References. Perjury, §5-53-102.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 90, § 8; C. & M. Dig., § 4929; Pope's Dig., § 6151; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-201; Acts 2009, No. 1465, § 2.

10-2-302. [Repealed.]

All process issued by the House of Representatives and subpoenas and other process for witnesses when attendance may be required in the House or before a committee of the House shall be under the hand of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and attested by the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives.

All process issued by the Senate shall be under the hand of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and attested by the Secretary of the Senate.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 90, § 10; C. & M. Dig., § 4931; Pope's Dig., § 6153; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-203; Acts 2009, No. 1465, § 4.

10-2-304. Fees, costs, and expenses.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 90, §§ 11, 12; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4932, 4933; Pope's Dig., §§ 6154, 6155; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-204, 4-205.

10-2-305. Depositions.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 90, §§ 6, 7; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4927, 4928; Pope's Dig., §§ 6149, 6150; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-206, 4-207.

10-2-306. Administration of oaths by committee — Depositions — Perjury.

The circuit court shall punish the person for contempt of the General Assembly under subdivision (b)(1) of this section in the same manner as punishment for contempt is imposed for failure to respond to a subpoena or directive of the circuit court.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 37, § 1, p. 113; C. & M. Dig., § 4944; Pope's Dig., § 6166; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-208; Acts 2009, No. 1465, § 5.

10-2-307. Subpoena by committee.

The committee so empowered may issue its subpoena signed by its chair or acting chair for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers or records, and the subpoena may be served by any officer authorized to serve process in civil cases.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 37, § 2, p. 113; C. & M. Dig., § 4945; Pope's Dig., § 6167; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-209; Acts 2009, No. 1465, § 5.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “subpoena” for “summons” in the section heading and the section.

10-2-308. Interrogatories by committee.

If in the discretion of the committee it is desirable to take the testimony of any witness without having the witness present, this may be done by reducing to writing the interrogatories to be proposed to the witness and forwarding them to any officer in this state authorized to administer oaths, and he or she is clothed with power and authorized to compel the attendance of the witness before him or her at a place to be by him or her designated by summons and attachment and to take the answer of the witness to the interrogatories, requiring the witness to subscribe and swear to the truthfulness of the interrogatories, which affidavit shall be certified by the officer.

The usual fees allowed officers for taking depositions and witnesses for their attendance shall be allowed for the services authorized by this section, to be paid as other current expenses of the General Assembly. The fees shall not be demanded in advance.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning lobbyists, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 851, § 1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

10-2-401. Acts 1967, No. 162, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-801.

10-2-402. Acts 1967, No. 162, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-802.

10-2-403. Acts 1967, No. 162, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-803.

10-2-404. Acts 1967, No. 162, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-804.

Effective Dates. Acts 2003, No. 1725, § 2: Apr. 22, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that our present state of technology makes it possible for members of the General Assembly to more readily communicate with staff; that past procedures for preparation of documents for the General Assembly are antiquated and in some instances produce unintended results; that this act will provide the staff with necessary guidance; and that this act must go into effect as soon as possible in order to enhance the legislative process. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 493, § 3: Mar. 2, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current law concerning preparation of legislation by the Bureau of Legislative Research is too restrictive and impairs the function of the General Assembly; that this act corrects deficiencies in the law; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to assist the operations of the 2005 regular session of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Draft any bill, resolution, or amendment for the member pursuant to the instructions of a lobbyist registered under § 21-8-601 without the prior direct approval of the member;

List the name of the member on any bill, resolution, or amendment pursuant to the instructions of a lobbyist registered under § 21-8-601 without the prior direct approval of the member; or

On a bill, resolution, or amendment of which the member is the lead sponsor, establish the order of cosponsors pursuant to the instructions of a lobbyist registered under § 21-8-601 without the prior direct approval of the lead sponsor.

The prior direct approval requirement of this section is met when a senator or representative communicates authorization to the staff of the bureau by telephone, electronic mail, fax, other written document, or in person.

Cross References. Disclosure by lobbyists, §21-8-601 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-16 and 19 may not apply to subchapters 17, 18, and 20, which were enacted subsequently.

Am. Jur. 72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, § 50 et seq.

C.J.S. 81A C.J.S., States, § 55.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 37, § 3, p. 113; C. & M. Dig., § 4946; Pope's Dig., § 6168; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-210.

Subchapter 4

— Lobbyists

10-2-401 — 10-2-404. [Repealed.]

10-2-501. Preparation.

A member of the General Assembly may choose to impose the restrictions of subsection (b) of this section by filing written notice with the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research.

If requested in writing by a member of the General Assembly, the staff of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall not:

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1725, § 1; 2005, No. 493, § 1.

10-2-211. [Repealed.]

10-2-215. Expense reimbursement for committee chairs, vice chairs, and cochairs.

10-2-217. Compensation for members of interim committees and for performance of other interim duties.

10-2-219, 10-2-220. [Reserved.]

10-2-303. Process — Issuance and execution.

Subchapter 5

— Bills, Resolutions, and Amendments